Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB28.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 401 of the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 401. Practitioner registration.* * *(d) Department authority.--The department may place one or more conditions on a practitioner for inclusion in the registry, including:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (1) A term of probation.(2) A limitation on the number of certifications the practitioner may issue within a set time frame. The time frame may be extended by the department if the extension is necessary to protect the health and safety of patients in the program.(3) Supervision by another practitioner who has agreed to oversee the practitioner for a set time frame. The time frame may be extended by the department if an extension is necessary to protect the health and safety of patients in the program.(4) Reporting requirements to the department, including the submission of documentation necessary for the department to ensure that the practitioner is complying with this act and any conditions placed upon the practitioner.(5) Any other condition that the department determines is necessary to protect the health and safety of patients in the program.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0028PN0009 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819